Hawaii statutes.
[§431R-4] Report to insurance commissioner.
(a) No later than March 31 of
each calendar year, each prescription drug benefit plan, health benefits plan under chapter 87A, and pharmacy benefit manager shall
file with the insurance commissioner, in such form and detail as the insurance
commissioner shall prescribe, a report for the preceding calendar year stating
that the pharmacy benefit manager or prescription drug benefit plan is in
compliance with this chapter. The report shall fully disclose the amount,
terms, and conditions relating to copayments, reimbursement options, and other
payments associated with a prescription drug benefit plan.

(b) The insurance commissioner shall review
and examine records supporting the accuracy and completeness of the report and,
no later than ninety days after the receipt of the report, shall make available
to a purchaser of a prescription drug benefit plan and to any retail community
pharmacy participating in a retail pharmacy network under section 431R-2 that
provides benefits to beneficiaries of a prescription drug benefit plan a
summary of the amount, terms, and conditions relating to copayments,
reimbursement options, and other payments associated with a prescription drug
benefit plan. [L 2013, c 226, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next